Nebraska, session 109, LB606.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 28-322, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-322 For purposes of sections 28-322 to 28-322.03:
(1) Inmate or parolee means any individual confined in a facility
operated by the Department of Correctional Services or a city or county
correctional or jail facility or under parole supervision; and
(2) Person means (a) an individual employed by the Department of
Correctional Services or by the Division of Parole Supervision, including
any individual working in central administration of the department, any
individual working under contract with the department, and any
individual, other than an inmate's spouse, to whom the department has
authorized or delegated control over an inmate or an inmate's activities,
(b) an individual employed by a city or county correctional or jail
facility, including any individual working in central administration of
the city or county correctional or jail facility, any individual working
under contract with the city or county correctional or jail facility, and
any individual, other than an inmate's spouse, to whom the city or county
correctional or jail facility has authorized or delegated control over an
inmate or an inmate's activities, and (c) an individual employed by the
Office of Probation Administration who performs official duties within
any facility operated by the Department of Correctional Services or a
city or county correctional or jail facility.
Sec. 2. Section 29-2246, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-2246 For purposes of the Nebraska Probation Administration Act
and sections 43-2,123.01 and 83-1,102 to 83-1,104, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) Association means the Nebraska District Court Judges
Association;
(2) Court means a district court, county court, or juvenile court as
defined in section 43-245;
-2-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
(3) Office means the Office of Probation Administration;
(4) Probation means a sentence under which a person found guilty of
a crime upon verdict or plea or adjudicated delinquent or in need of
special supervision is released by a court subject to conditions imposed
by the court and subject to supervision. Probation includes post-release
supervision and supervision ordered by a court pursuant to a deferred
judgment under section 29-2292 or 29-4803;
(5) Probationer means a person sentenced to probation or post-
release supervision;
(6) Probation officer means an employee of the system who supervises
probationers and conducts presentence, predisposition, or other
investigations as may be required by law or directed by a court in which
he or she is serving or performs such other duties as authorized pursuant
to section 29-2258, except unpaid volunteers from the community;
(7) Juvenile probation officer means any probation officer who
supervises probationers of a separate juvenile court;
(8) Juvenile intake probation officer means an employee of the
system who is called upon by a law enforcement officer in accordance with
section 43-250 to make a decision regarding the furtherance of a
juvenile's detention;
(9) Chief probation officer means the probation officer in charge of
a probation district;
(10) System means the Nebraska Probation System;
(11) Administrator means the probation administrator;
(12) Non-probation-based program or service means a program or
service established within the district, county, or juvenile courts and
provided to individuals not sentenced to probation who have been charged
with or convicted of a crime for the purpose of diverting the individual
from incarceration or to provide treatment for issues related to the
individual's criminogenic needs. Non-probation-based programs or services
include, but are not limited to, problem solving courts established
-3-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
pursuant to section 24-1302 and the treatment of problems relating to
substance abuse, mental health, sex offenses, or domestic violence;
(13) Post-release supervision means the portion of a split sentence
following a period of incarceration under which a person found guilty of
a crime upon verdict or plea is released by a court subject to conditions
imposed by the court and subject to supervision by the office; and
(14) Rules and regulations means policies and procedures written by
the office and approved by the Supreme Court.
Sec. 3. Section 29-2252, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-2252 The administrator shall:
(1) Supervise and administer the office;
(2) Establish and maintain policies, standards, and procedures for
the system, with the concurrence of the Supreme Court;
(3) Prescribe and furnish such forms for records and reports for the
system as shall be deemed necessary for uniformity, efficiency, and
statistical accuracy;
(4) Establish minimum qualifications for employment as a probation
officer in this state and establish and maintain such additional
qualifications as he or she deems appropriate for appointment to the
system. Qualifications for probation officers shall be established in
accordance with subsection (4) of section 29-2253. An ex-offender
released from a penal complex or a county jail may be appointed to a
position of deputy probation or parole officer. Such ex-offender shall
maintain a record free of arrests, except for minor traffic violations,
for one year immediately preceding his or her appointment;
(5) Establish and maintain advanced periodic inservice training
requirements for the system;
(6) Cooperate with all agencies, public or private, which are
concerned with treatment or welfare of persons on probation. All
information provided to the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and
-4-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
Criminal Justice for the purpose of providing access to such information
to law enforcement agencies through the state's criminal justice
information system shall be provided in a manner that allows such
information to be readily accessible through the main interface of the
system;
(7) Organize and conduct training programs for probation officers.
Training shall include the proper use of a risk and needs assessment,
risk-based supervision strategies, relationship skills, cognitive
behavioral interventions, community-based resources, criminal risk
factors, and targeting criminal risk factors to reduce recidivism and the
proper use of a matrix of administrative sanctions, custodial sanctions,
and rewards developed pursuant to subdivision (18) of this section. All
probation officers employed on or after August 30, 2015, shall complete
the training requirements set forth in this subdivision;
(8) Collect, develop, and maintain statistical information
concerning probationers, probation practices, and the operation of the
system and provide the Community Corrections Division of the Nebraska
Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice with the information
needed to compile the report required in section 47-624;
(9) Interpret the probation program to the public with a view toward
developing a broad base of public support;
(10) Conduct research for the purpose of evaluating and improving
the effectiveness of the system. Subject to the availability of funding,
the administrator shall contract with an independent contractor or
academic institution for evaluation of existing community corrections
facilities and programs operated by the office;
(11) Adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as may be
necessary or proper for the operation of the office or system. The
administrator shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for
transitioning individuals on probation across levels of supervision and
discharging them from supervision consistent with evidence-based
-5-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
practices. The rules and regulations shall ensure supervision resources
are prioritized for individuals who are high risk to reoffend, require
transitioning individuals down levels of supervision intensity based on
assessed risk and months of supervision without a reported major
violation, and establish incentives for earning discharge from
supervision based on compliance;
(12) Transmit a report during each even-numbered year to the Supreme
Court on the operation of the office for the preceding two calendar years
which shall include a historical analysis of probation officer workload,
including participation in non-probation-based programs and services. The
report shall be transmitted by the Supreme Court to the Governor and the
Clerk of the Legislature. The report submitted to the Clerk of the
Legislature shall be submitted electronically;
(13) Administer the payment by the state of all salaries, travel,
and expenses authorized under section 29-2259 incident to the conduct and
maintenance of the office;
(14) Use the funds provided under section 29-2262.07 to augment
operational or personnel costs associated with the development,
implementation, and evaluation of enhanced probation-based programs and
non-probation-based programs and services in which probation personnel or
probation resources are utilized pursuant to an interlocal agreement
authorized by subdivision (16) of this section and to purchase services
to provide such programs aimed at enhancing adult probationer or non-
probation-based program participant supervision in the community and
treatment needs of probationers and non-probation-based program
participants. Enhanced probation-based programs include, but are not
limited to, specialized units of supervision, related equipment purchases
and training, and programs that address a probationer's vocational,
educational, mental health, behavioral, or substance abuse treatment
needs;
(15) Ensure that any risk or needs assessment instrument utilized by
-6-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
the system be periodically validated;
(16) Have the authority to enter into interlocal agreements in which
probation resources or probation personnel may be utilized in conjunction
with or as part of non-probation-based programs and services. Any such
interlocal agreement shall comply with section 29-2255;
(17) Collaborate with the Community Corrections Division of the
Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice and the
Department of Correctional Services Division of Parole Supervision to
develop rules governing the participation of parolees in community
corrections programs operated by the Office of Probation Administration;
(18) Develop a matrix of rewards for compliance and positive
behaviors and graduated administrative sanctions and custodial sanctions
for use in responding to and deterring substance abuse violations and
technical violations. As applicable under sections 29-2266.02 and
29-2266.03, custodial sanctions of up to thirty days in jail shall be
designated as the most severe response to a violation in lieu of
revocation and custodial sanctions of up to three days in jail shall be
designated as the second most severe response;
(19) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the creation of
individualized post-release supervision plans, collaboratively with the
Department of Correctional Services and county jails, for probationers
sentenced to post-release supervision; and
(20) Exercise all powers and perform all duties necessary and proper
to carry out his or her responsibilities.
Each member of the Legislature shall receive an electronic copy of
the report required by subdivision (12) of this section by making a
request for it to the administrator.
Sec. 4. Section 29-2261, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-2261 (1) Unless it is impractical to do so, when an offender has
been convicted of a felony other than murder in the first degree, the
-7-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
court shall not impose sentence without first ordering a presentence
investigation of the offender and according due consideration to a
written report of such investigation. When an offender has been convicted
of murder in the first degree and (a) a jury renders a verdict finding
the existence of one or more aggravating circumstances as provided in
section 29-2520 or (b)(i) the information contains a notice of
aggravation as provided in section 29-1603 and (ii) the offender waives
his or her right to a jury determination of the alleged aggravating
circumstances, the court shall not commence the sentencing determination
proceeding as provided in section 29-2521 without first ordering a
presentence investigation of the offender and according due consideration
to a written report of such investigation.
(2) A court may order a presentence investigation in any case,
except in cases in which an offender has been convicted of a Class IIIA
misdemeanor, a Class IV misdemeanor, a Class V misdemeanor, a traffic
infraction, or any corresponding city or village ordinance.
(3) The presentence investigation and report shall include, when
available, an analysis of the circumstances attending the commission of
the crime, the offender's history of delinquency or criminality, physical
and mental condition, family situation and background, economic status,
education, occupation, and personal habits, and any other matters that
the probation officer deems relevant or the court directs to be included.
All local and state police agencies and Department of Correctional
Services adult correctional facilities shall furnish to the probation
officer copies of such criminal records, in any such case referred to the
probation officer by the court of proper jurisdiction, as the probation
officer shall require without cost to the court or the probation officer.
Such investigation shall also include:
(a) Any written statements submitted to the county attorney by a
victim; and
(b) Any written statements submitted to the probation officer by a
-8-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
victim.
(4) If there are no written statements submitted to the probation
officer, he or she shall certify to the court that:
(a) He or she has attempted to contact the victim; and
(b) If he or she has contacted the victim, such officer offered to
accept the written statements of the victim or to reduce such victim's
oral statements to writing.
For purposes of subsections (3) and (4) of this section, the term
victim shall be as defined in section 29-119.
(5) Before imposing sentence, the court may order the offender to
submit to psychiatric observation and examination for a period of not
exceeding sixty days or such longer period as the court determines to be
necessary for that purpose. The offender may be remanded for this purpose
to any available clinic or mental hospital, or the court may appoint a
qualified psychiatrist to make the examination. The report of the
examination shall be submitted to the court.
(6)(a) Any presentence report, substance abuse evaluation, or
psychiatric examination shall be privileged and shall not be disclosed
directly or indirectly to anyone other than a judge; probation officers
to whom an offender's file is duly transferred; the probation
administrator or his or her designee; alcohol and drug counselors, mental
health practitioners, psychiatrists, and psychologists licensed or
certified under the Uniform Credentialing Act to conduct substance abuse
evaluations and treatment; or others entitled by law to receive such
information, including personnel and mental health professionals for the
Nebraska State Patrol specifically assigned to sex offender registration
and community notification for the sole purpose of using such report,
evaluation, or examination for assessing risk and for community
notification of registered sex offenders.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, mental health professional
means (i) a practicing physician licensed to practice medicine in this
-9-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
state under the Medicine and Surgery Practice Act, (ii) a practicing
psychologist licensed to engage in the practice of psychology in this
state as provided in section 38-3111 or as provided under similar
provisions of the Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact, (iii) a
practicing mental health professional licensed or certified in this state
as provided in the Mental Health Practice Act, or (iv) a practicing
professional counselor holding a privilege to practice in Nebraska under
the Licensed Professional Counselors Interstate Compact.
(7) The court shall permit inspection of the presentence report,
substance abuse evaluation, or psychiatric examination or parts of the
report, evaluation, or examination, as determined by the court, by the
prosecuting attorney and defense counsel. Such inspection shall be by
electronic access only unless the court determines such access is not
available to the prosecuting attorney or defense counsel. The State Court
Administrator shall determine and develop the means of electronic access
to such presentence reports, evaluations, and examinations. Upon
application by the prosecuting attorney or defense counsel, the court may
order that addresses, telephone numbers, and other contact information
for victims or witnesses named in the report, evaluation, or examination
be redacted upon a showing by a preponderance of the evidence that such
redaction is warranted in the interests of public safety. The court may
permit inspection of the presentence report, substance abuse evaluation,
or psychiatric examination or examination of parts of the report,
evaluation, or examination by any other person having a proper interest
therein whenever the court finds it is in the best interest of a
particular offender. The court may allow fair opportunity for an offender
to provide additional information for the court's consideration.
(8) If an offender is sentenced to imprisonment, a copy of the
report of any presentence investigation, substance abuse evaluation, or
psychiatric examination shall be transmitted immediately to the
Department of Correctional Services. Upon request, the department shall
-10-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
provide a copy of the report to the Board of Parole , the Division of
Parole Supervision, and the Board of Pardons.
(9) Notwithstanding subsections (6) and (7) of this section, the
Supreme Court or an agent of the Supreme Court acting under the direction
and supervision of the Chief Justice shall have access to psychiatric
examinations, substance abuse evaluations, and presentence investigations
and reports for research purposes. The Supreme Court and its agent shall
treat such information as confidential, and nothing identifying any
individual shall be released.
Sec. 5. Section 29-2935, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-2935 For purposes of evaluating the treatment process, the
Division of Parole Supervision, the Department of Correctional Services,
the Board of Parole, and the designated aftercare treatment programs
shall allow appropriate access to data and information as requested by
the Department of Health and Human Services.
Sec. 6. Section 29-4019, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-4019 (1) When sentencing a person convicted of an offense which
requires lifetime community supervision upon release pursuant to section
83-174.03, the sentencing court shall:
(a) Provide written notice to the defendant that he or she shall be
subject to lifetime community supervision by the Department of
Correctional Services Division of Parole Supervision upon release from
incarceration or civil commitment. The written notice shall inform the
defendant (i) that he or she shall be subject to lifetime community
supervision by the department division upon release and that the
department division shall conduct a risk assessment and evaluation to
determine the conditions of community supervision which will minimize, in
the least restrictive manner that is compatible with public safety, the
risk of the defendant committing additional offenses, (ii) that a
-11-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
violation of any of the conditions of community supervision imposed by
the department division may result in the revision of existing
conditions, the addition of new conditions, a recommendation that civil
commitment proceedings should be instituted, or criminal prosecution, and
(iii) of his or her right to challenge the determination of the
conditions of community supervision by the department division and the
right to a periodic review of the conditions of community supervision
pursuant to section 83-174.03 to determine if the conditions are still
necessary to protect the public;
(b) Require the defendant to read and sign a form stating that the
duty of the defendant to comply with the conditions of community
supervision and his or her rights to challenge the conditions of
community supervision imposed by the department division has been
explained; and
(c) Retain a copy of the written notification signed by the
defendant.
(2) Prior to the release of a person serving a sentence for an
offense requiring lifetime community supervision by the Division of
Parole Supervision pursuant to section 83-174.03, the Department of
Correctional Services, the Department of Health and Human Services, or a
city or county correctional or jail facility shall:
(a) Provide written notice to the person that he or she shall be
subject to lifetime community supervision by the Department of
Correctional Services division upon release from incarceration. The
written notice shall inform the person (i) that he or she shall be
subject to lifetime community supervision by the department division upon
release and that the department division shall conduct a risk assessment
and evaluation of the defendant to determine the conditions of community
supervision which will minimize, in the least restrictive manner that is
compatible with public safety, the risk of the person committing
additional offenses, (ii) that a violation of any of the conditions of
-12-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
community supervision imposed by the department division may result in
the revision of existing conditions, the addition of new conditions, a
recommendation that civil commitment proceedings should be instituted, or
criminal prosecution, and (iii) of his or her right to challenge the
determination of the conditions of community supervision by the
department division and the right to a periodic review of the conditions
of community supervision pursuant to section 83-174.03 to determine if
the conditions are still necessary to protect the public;
(b) Require the defendant to read and sign a form stating that the
duty of the defendant to comply with the conditions of community
supervision and his or her right to challenge the conditions of community
supervision imposed by the department division has been explained; and
(c) Retain a copy of the written notification signed by the person.
Sec. 7. Section 47-624, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
47-624 The division shall:
(1) Collaborate with the Office of Probation Administration , the
Division of Parole Supervision, and the Department of Correctional
Services to develop and implement a plan to establish statewide operation
and use of a continuum of community correctional facilities and programs;
(2) Develop, in consultation with the probation administrator and
the Director of Correctional Supervision and Services of the Division of
Parole Supervision, standards for the use of community correctional
facilities and programs by the Nebraska Probation System and the parole
system;
(3) Collaborate with the Office of Probation Administration , the
Division of Parole Supervision, and the Department of Correctional
Services on the development of additional reporting centers as set forth
in section 47-624.01;
(4) Analyze and promote the consistent use of offender risk
assessment tools;
-13-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
(5) Educate the courts, the Board of Parole, criminal justice system
stakeholders, and the general public about the availability, use, and
benefits of community correctional facilities and programs;
(6) Enter into and administer contracts, if necessary, to carry out
the purposes of the Community Corrections Act;
(7) In order to ensure adequate funding for substance abuse
treatment programs, consult with the probation administrator and the
Director of Correctional Supervision and Services of the Division of
Parole Supervision and develop or assist with the development of programs
as provided in subdivision (14) of section 29-2252 and subdivision (20)
(8) of section 83-173 83-1,102;
(8) Study substance abuse and mental health treatment services in
and related to the criminal justice system, recommend improvements, and
evaluate the implementation of improvements;
(9) Research and evaluate existing community correctional facilities
and programs, within the limits of available funding;
(10) Develop standardized definitions of outcome measures for
community correctional facilities and programs, including, but not
limited to, recidivism, employment, and substance abuse;
(11) Report annually to the Legislature and the Governor on the
development and performance of community correctional facilities and
programs. The report submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted
electronically. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the
following:
(a) A description of community correctional facilities and programs
currently serving offenders in Nebraska, which includes the following
information:
(i) The target population and geographic area served by each
facility or program, eligibility requirements, and the total number of
offenders utilizing the facility or program over the past year;
(ii) Services, programs, assessments, case management, supervision,
-14-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
and tools provided for offenders at the facility, in the program, or
under the supervision of a governmental agency in any capacity;
(iii) The costs of operating the facility or program and the cost
per offender; and
(iv) The funding sources for the facility or program;
(b) The progress made in expanding community correctional facilities
and programs statewide and an analysis of the need for additional
community corrections services;
(c) An analysis of the impact community correctional facilities and
programs have on the number of offenders incarcerated within the
Department of Correctional Services; and
(d) The recidivism rates and outcome data for probationers,
parolees, and problem-solving-court clients participating in community
corrections programs;
(12) Grant funds to entities including local governmental agencies,
nonprofit organizations, and behavioral health services which will
support the intent of the Community Corrections Act act;
(13) Manage all offender data acquired by the division in a
confidential manner and develop procedures to ensure that identifiable
information is not released;
(14) Establish and administer grants, projects, and programs for the
operation of the division; and
(15) Perform such other duties as may be necessary to carry out the
policy of the state established in the act.
Sec. 8. Section 47-624.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
47-624.01 (1) The division shall collaborate with the Office of
Probation Administration , the Division of Parole Supervision, and the
Department of Correctional Services in developing a plan for the
implementation and funding of reporting centers in Nebraska.
(2) The plan shall include recommended locations for at least one
-15-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
reporting center in each district court judicial district that currently
lacks such a center and shall prioritize the recommendations for
additional reporting centers based upon need.
(3) The plan shall also identify and prioritize the need for
expansion of reporting centers in those district court judicial districts
which currently have a reporting center but have an unmet need for
additional reporting center services due to capacity, distance, or
demographic factors.
Sec. 9. Section 47-627, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
47-627 The director shall develop and maintain a uniform crime data
analysis system in Nebraska which shall include, but need not be limited
to, the number of offenses, arrests, charges, probation admissions,
probation violations, probation discharges, participants in specialized
community corrections programs, admissions to and discharges from
problem-solving courts, admissions to and discharges from the Department
of Correctional Services, parole reviews, parole hearings, releases on
parole, parole violations, and parole discharges. The data shall be
categorized by statutory crime. The data shall be collected from the
Board of Parole, the State Court Administrator, the Department of
Correctional Services, the Division of Parole Supervision, the Office of
Probation Administration, the Nebraska State Patrol, counties, local law
enforcement, and any other entity associated with criminal justice. The
division and the Supreme Court shall have access to such data to
implement the Community Corrections Act.
Sec. 10. Section 47-629, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
47-629 (1) The Board of Parole may parole an offender to a community
correctional facility or program pursuant to guidelines developed by the
division.
(2) The Department of Correctional Services and the Division of
-16-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
Parole Supervision shall utilize community correctional facilities and
programs as appropriate.
Sec. 11. Section 47-903, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
47-903 For purposes of the Office of Inspector General of the
Nebraska Correctional System Act, the following definitions apply:
(1) Administrator means a person charged with administration of a
program, an office, or a division of the department or administration of
a private agency;
(2) Department means the Department of Correctional Services;
(3) Director means the Director of Correctional Services;
(4) Division of Parole Supervision means the division created
pursuant to section 83-1,100;
(4) (5) Inspector General means the Inspector General of the
Nebraska Correctional System appointed under section 47-904;
(5) (6) Malfeasance means a wrongful act that the actor has no legal
right to do or any wrongful conduct that affects, interrupts, or
interferes with performance of an official duty;
(6) (7) Management means supervision of subordinate employees;
(7) (8) Misfeasance means the improper performance of some act that
a person may lawfully do;
(8) (9) Obstruction means hindering an investigation, preventing an
investigation from progressing, stopping or delaying the progress of an
investigation, or making the progress of an investigation difficult or
slow;
(9) (10) Office means the office of Inspector General of the
Nebraska Correctional System and includes the Inspector General and other
employees of the office;
(10) (11) Private agency means an entity that contracts with the
department or contracts to provide services to another entity that
contracts with the department; and
-17-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
(11) (12) Record means any recording in written, audio, electronic
transmission, or computer storage form, including, but not limited to, a
draft, memorandum, note, report, computer printout, notation, or message,
and includes, but is not limited to, medical records, mental health
records, case files, clinical records, financial records, and
administrative records.
Sec. 12. Section 47-908, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
47-908 All employees of the department , all employees of the
Division of Parole Supervision, and all owners, operators, managers,
supervisors, and employees of private agencies shall cooperate with the
office. Cooperation includes, but is not limited to, the following:
(1) Provision of full access to and production of records and
information. Providing access to and producing records and information
for the office is not a violation of confidentiality provisions under any
statute, rule, or regulation if done in good faith for purposes of an
investigation under the Office of Inspector General of the Nebraska
Correctional System Act;
(2) Fair and honest disclosure of records and information reasonably
requested by the office in the course of an investigation under the act;
(3) Encouraging employees to fully comply with reasonable requests
of the office in the course of an investigation under the act;
(4) Prohibition of retaliation by owners, operators, or managers
against employees for providing records or information or filing or
otherwise making a complaint to the office;
(5) Not requiring employees to gain supervisory approval prior to
filing a complaint with or providing records or information to the
office;
(6) Provision of complete and truthful answers to questions posed by
the office in the course of an investigation; and
(7) Not willfully interfering with or obstructing the investigation.
-18-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
Sec. 13. Section 47-919, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
47-919 The department Division of Parole Supervision shall provide
the Public Counsel and the Inspector General with direct computer access
to all computerized records, reports, and documents maintained in
connection with administration of the Nebraska parole system, except that
access for the Public Counsel and the Inspector General to a parolee's
medical or mental health records shall be subject to the parolee's
consent.
Sec. 14. Section 47-1102, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
47-1102 (1) The Legislature finds that studies have shown that post-
prison outcomes tend to be better for committed offenders who participate
in work release programs prior to discharge from custody. Specifically,
findings indicate that committed offenders who participated in work
release programs had a higher likelihood of obtaining post-release
employment within the first calendar quarter after release and also had a
significantly lower rate of recidivism than committed offenders who did
not participate in work release programs prior to discharge from custody.
In addition, studies indicate that committed offenders who participated
in privately operated work release programs were significantly more
likely to become employed after release.
(2) In light of these findings, and in order to give the Board of
Parole and the Department of Correctional Services additional options for
the placement of committed offenders, it is the intent of the
Legislature:
(a) To increase the number of committed offenders in the Nebraska
correctional system who are exposed to work release prior to discharge
from custody; and
(b) To do so in settings that also offer therapy, programming,
treatment, vocational training, and educational classes.
-19-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
(3) To achieve these goals, the purpose of the Community Work
Release and Reentry Centers Act is to empower the Division of Parole
Supervision and the Department of Correctional Services to contract with
private providers to establish community work release and reentry centers
at various locations throughout the State of Nebraska.
Sec. 15. Section 47-1103, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
47-1103 For purposes of the Community Work Release and Reentry
Centers Act:
(1) Advisory board means the Reentry Continuity Advisory Board
established in section 47-1117;
(2) Board means the Board of Parole;
(3) Committed offender has the same meaning as in section 83-170;
(4) Community work release and reentry center or center means a
residential home, halfway house, or other facility operated by a private
provider pursuant to an agreement in writing either with the division or
the department for providing housing and supervision of committed
offenders placed in the center by the department division for work
release and for vocational training, education, programming, or
behavioral health or mental health treatment;
(5) Department means the Department of Correctional Services;
(6) Division means the Division of Parole Supervision;
(6) (7) Individualized release plan means a detailed written plan
outlining a committed offender's future vocational goals, training,
employment, and needed treatment services following the committed
offender's release from a community work release and reentry center;
(7) (8) Private provider means a partnership, corporation,
association, joint venture, organization, or similar entity which is
operated on a nonprofit basis and which, under a contract with either the
division or the department, has agreed to operate a community work
release and reentry center pursuant to the act;
-20-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
(8) (9) Probation administration means the Office of Probation
Administration;
(9) (10) Reentering person means an individual who is subject to
supervision by the board division or probation administration, not
including juvenile probation, or who was recently in the custody of the
department or a county jail and was released with no supervision;
(10) (11) Reentry housing means temporary housing for reentering
persons, generally in the first year following a period of incarceration;
and
(11)(a) (12)(a) Reentry housing facility means a facility which is
owned or operated by a private organization, whether nonprofit or for-
profit, that receives direct payment from the board, division, probation
administration, or department to provide reentry housing.
(b) Reentry housing facility includes, but is not limited to, a
community work release and reentry center.
(c) Reentry housing facility does not include a health care facility
as defined in section 71-413.
Sec. 16. Section 47-1104, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
47-1104 (1) The department division may place a parole-eligible
committed offender at a community work release and reentry center as
provided in the Community Work Release and Reentry Centers Act.
(2) Any parole-eligible committed offender placed at a community
work release and reentry center pursuant to the act:
(a) Shall be under the continuing jurisdiction and authority of the
department and board as if the committed offender was selected for
release on ordinary parole status as provided for in section 83-192; and
(b) May be subsequently released by the board on ordinary parole
status as provided for in section 83-192.
(3) The department may place a committed offender whose sentence
includes a term of post-release supervision and who is within three years
-21-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
of his or her release date at a community work release and reentry center
as provided in the act. Any such committed offender placed at a center
shall be under the continuing jurisdiction and authority of the
department.
Sec. 17. Section 47-1105, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
47-1105 (1) The division and the department may exercise all powers
and perform all duties necessary and proper for carrying out their
responsibilities under the Community Work Release and Reentry Centers
Act.
(2) The division and the department may use designated funds
provided by the Legislature to enter into agreements with private
providers for the development and operation of community work release and
reentry centers to be established at various locations throughout the
state. Any such agreement shall require a private provider to:
(a) Establish a contract with public or private employers to provide
employment for committed offenders placed at the center;
(b) Assist any committed offender placed at the center to obtain and
maintain employment in the community;
(c) Provide vocational training, education, programming, and
treatment for issues related to the criminogenic needs of any committed
offender placed at the center; and
(d) Otherwise direct and supervise the activities and behavior of
any committed offender placed at the center as provided in the act.
(3) In an agreement under this section, the division or the
department may include contractual requirements that obligate the private
provider to offer to any committed offender placed at the center:
(a) Specialized educational or vocational training; and
(b) Other programming that will address the mental health,
behavioral health, or substance abuse treatment needs of such committed
offender.
-22-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
(4) An agreement under this section shall require the community work
release and reentry center to establish programs, rules, and enforcement
systems:
(a) Regarding the behavior of committed offenders;
(b) To ensure that committed offenders seek and retain continuous
employment;
(c) For the treatment of committed offenders for substance abuse;
(d) To ensure that committed offenders only leave the center for
purposes of work or for other specified and approved activities,
including, but not limited to, job interviews, medical appointments,
treatment, and outings to visit family;
(e) To ensure that committed offenders consistently participate in
all necessary therapy, programming, treatment, vocational training, and
educational classes; and
(f) To ensure that committed offenders maintain their scheduled work
hours.
Sec. 18. Section 47-1106, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
47-1106 The division and the department shall set standards for the
appropriate staffing levels of community work release and reentry
centers. The division and the department shall require each center to:
(1) Be under the supervision and control of a designated center
director approved by the division or the department;
(2) Be adequately staffed twenty-four hours per day, including on
weekends and holidays; and
(3) Assign an individual counselor to each committed offender
assigned to the center.
Sec. 19. Section 47-1107, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
47-1107 (1) The division and the department shall require each
community work release and reentry center to establish an individualized
-23-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
release plan for each committed offender assigned to the center. The
staff of a center shall assist the division and the department in making
reasonable advance preparations for the release of such committed
offenders.
(2) If a parole-eligible committed offender is released from a
center, the offender shall be subject to parole conditions set by the
board and under the supervision of a district parole officer assigned by
the division pursuant to section 83-1,104. The individualized release
plan for a parole-eligible committed offender shall be developed in
coordination with the assigned district parole officer.
(3) If a committed offender whose sentence includes a term of post-
release supervision is released from a center, the offender shall be
subject to the conditions of his or her order of post-release supervision
and under the supervision of a district probation officer. The
individualized release plan for such an offender shall be developed in
coordination with the assigned district probation officer.
Sec. 20. Section 47-1108, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
47-1108 (1) The division and the department shall set requirements
for the maintenance of the individual records of committed offenders
assigned to a community work release and reentry center.
(2) The division and the department shall require each community
work release and reentry center to make periodic reports to the division
and the department on the performance of each committed offender assigned
to the center.
Sec. 21. Section 47-1109, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
47-1109 The division and the department shall establish an internal
system for assessing the achievements of community work release and
reentry centers and the effectiveness of the Community Work Release and
Reentry Centers Act as a whole. The division and the department shall
-24-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
develop and maintain measurable goals and objectives for such assessment.
Sec. 22. Section 47-1110, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
47-1110 (1) The department division shall designate a parole officer
to monitor the performance of each parole-eligible committed offender who
is assigned to a community work release and reentry center. The
designated parole officer shall be required to periodically report to the
department division on the progress of the committed offender.
(2) The department shall designate a correctional officer to monitor
the performance of each committed offender who is assigned to a community
work release and reentry center under subsection (3) of section 47-1104.
The designated correctional officer shall be required to periodically
report to the department on the progress of the committed offender.
Sec. 23. Section 47-1111, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
47-1111 The division and the department shall develop an internal
program to conduct annual reviews of the performance of each community
work release and reentry center. A senior staff person of the division
and the department shall visit each center at least twice each year.
Sec. 24. Section 47-1113, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
47-1113 The division and the department may allow a community work
release and reentry center to have access to all of the records,
documents, and reports in the custody of the division or the department,
other than presentence investigation reports, that relate to any
committed offender who is assigned to the center.
Sec. 25. Section 47-1114, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
47-1114 (1) By July 1, 2026, the division and the department shall
develop a strategic plan and procedure to allow private providers to bid
on agreements to establish community work release and reentry centers
-25-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
pursuant to the Community Work Release and Reentry Centers Act.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate one million
dollars from the General Fund to carry out the Community Work Release and
Reentry Centers Act.
Sec. 26. Section 47-1115, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
47-1115 (1) The department, with the assistance of the board, shall
establish a program to encourage the development of reentry housing,
coordinate the provisions of reentry services, and provide standards for
reentry housing. Through this program, the department shall:
(a) Establish minimum standards for reentry housing facilities,
including requirements related to health and safety, insurance,
evaluations, and inspections, with input from the advisory committee;
(b) Monitor compliance with these minimum standards and investigate
suspected violations;
(c) Coordinate evaluations of reentry housing facilities based on
living conditions, staffing, programming, and other criteria;
(d) Communicate with relevant agencies regarding evaluation results
and compliance with minimum standards;
(e) Facilitate communication between the department, division,
board, probation administration, and reentry housing facilities regarding
reentering persons in need of housing and the availability of housing to
meet such needs;
(f) Engage in regular discussions with entities which organize and
prioritize housing services for people experiencing homelessness or at
risk of homelessness in Nebraska;
(g) Track data on costs, utilization, and outcomes for reentry
housing within the state and use this data to determine trends and
project future needs and costs; and
(h) Electronically submit an annual report to the Legislature, the
Supreme Court, and the Governor which describes the status of housing for
-26-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
reentering persons in Nebraska. The report shall include details on
housing-related expenditures, characteristics of reentry housing
facilities and other places which provide housing for reentering persons,
characteristics of the individuals receiving financial assistance for
housing, and recommendations for improving the quality and availability
of housing for reentering persons in the state.
(2) The department and board may use available funds to encourage
development of quality, safe reentry housing and to assist existing
reentry housing facilities in making improvements for the benefit of
reentering persons and public safety.
Sec. 27. Section 47-1116, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
47-1116 (1) Reentry housing facilities shall cooperate with
investigations and evaluations conducted pursuant to the Community Work
Release and Reentry Centers Act and shall provide the department, board,
division, probation administration, and the Office of Public Counsel with
reasonable access to facilities and records related to the provision of
reentry housing.
(2) The department or board may request the State Fire Marshal to
investigate any reentry housing facility for fire safety under section
81-502. The State Fire Marshal shall assess a fee for such inspection
under section 81-505.01 payable by the facility. The State Fire Marshal
may delegate the authority to make such inspections to qualified local
fire prevention personnel under section 81-502.
(3) The department or board may request a county, city, or village
to inspect any reentry housing facility for the purpose of administering
or enforcing the state building code or an applicable local building or
construction code enacted pursuant to the Building Construction Act, if
the county, city, or village has taken on the responsibility of code
enforcement. A county, city, or village may assess fees for such an
inspection under section 71-6406.
-27-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
(4) The department or board shall promptly notify a reentry housing
facility and relevant agencies if there is reason to believe conditions
in the facility present an imminent threat to the health or safety of
reentering persons residing at the facility.
(5) The department shall work with the board, division, probation
administration, and the advisory board to establish a speedy process by
which reentry housing facilities may contest the findings of any
investigation or evaluation pursuant to the Community Work Release and
Reentry Centers Act.
Sec. 28. Section 47-1117, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
47-1117 (1) The Reentry Continuity Advisory Board is created. The
board shall include the following members:
(a) The Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System;
(b) The Director of Correctional Services or his or her designee;
(c) The chairperson of the Board of Parole or his or her designee;
(d) The probation administrator or his or her designee; and
(e) Five additional members to be appointed by the Governor. Such
members shall include:
(i) An individual with experience in reentry and restorative justice
service delivery;
(ii) A victims' rights representative;
(iii) A formerly incarcerated individual;
(iv) An individual with expertise in mental or behavioral health;
and
(v) An individual with experience in public policy.
(2) The advisory board shall select a chairperson from among its
members.
(3) The advisory board shall identify areas for improving continuity
and collaboration among the department, the division, the board,
probation administration, and any other relevant criminal justice
-28-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
entities and offer advice on practices that will enhance the continuity
of reentry services and reentry housing for individuals in the criminal
justice system.
(4) The advisory board shall:
(a) Conduct regular meetings;
(b) Provide advice and assistance to the department and board
relating to reentry housing in Nebraska;
(c) Promote the interests of reentering persons and their families;
(d) Promote public safety through effective reintegration into the
community;
(e) Provide input on the process of evaluating reentry housing
facilities;
(f) Engage with neighborhood groups and other stakeholders;
(g) Provide reports as requested by the department and board; and
(h) Engage in other activities as requested by the department and
board.
(5) The advisory board shall convene at least quarterly. The members
described in subdivisions (1)(b), (c), and (d) of this section shall
attend each meeting of the advisory board and share and present
information relevant to the mission of the advisory board.
(6) The department, division, board, and probation administration
shall provide information requested by the advisory board related to its
mission. This shall include, but is not limited to, information
regarding:
(a) The use of evidence-based risk assessments and evidence-based
programming;
(b) Participation in rehabilitation and education programs;
(c) Treatment and programming offered, including vocational
training, substance abuse treatment, cognitive-behavioral therapy, and
mental health counseling;
(d) Population and demographic data;
-29-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
(e) Use of and need for transitional housing and reentry housing;
(f) Identified gaps in services;
(g) Recidivism;
(h) Institutional conduct; and
(i) Post-release and reentry planning and services;
(7) The advisory board shall conduct periodic evaluations of the
effectiveness of the collaborative efforts and reentry programs offered
by the department, division, board, probation administration, and other
criminal justice agencies. Such evaluation shall be accomplished using an
integrated reentry and rehabilitation framework, which shall include an
examination of:
(a) The extent to which agencies are conducting comprehensive
assessments of criminal justice-involved individuals' needs and risks,
including education, employment, housing, mental health, substance abuse,
and family support;
(b) Whether the agencies are providing individualized reentry
planning tailored to the specific needs and circumstances of such
individuals, with a focus on addressing criminogenic factors and
promoting positive behavioral change;
(c) Whether such individuals have access to evidence-based
interventions, programs, and services both during and following
incarceration, including education, vocational training, mental health
treatment, substance abuse counseling, and life skills development; and
(d) The extent of collaboration and coordination between the
department, parole, probation, other criminal justice agencies,
community-based organizations, and other stakeholders.
(8) The advisory board shall assist probation administration and ,
the department , and the division in implementing performance metrics for
staff as provided in sections 29-2243 and 83-171.01. The advisory board
shall regularly review such agencies' implementation and use of such
performance metrics and offer updated guidance to ensure that such
-30-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
metrics are aligned with best practices, stakeholder input, and the
evolving goals and priorities of the criminal justice system.
(9) On or before October 1, 2025, and on or before each October 1
thereafter, the advisory board shall electronically submit a report to
the Judiciary Committee of the Legislature. The report shall include data
regarding baselines, goals, efforts undertaken to achieve such goals, and
action steps outlined to meet such goals and set objectives. The report
shall detail the outcomes of parole decisions, reentry efforts,
recidivism rates, and any challenges encountered. The report shall
provide stakeholders with a clear understanding of the progress made,
challenges faced, and strategies employed throughout the reporting
period.
Sec. 29. Section 47-1119, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
47-1119 The department , division, and board may adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Community Work Release
and Reentry Centers Act.
Sec. 30. Section 71-961, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-961 (1) All records kept on any subject shall remain confidential
except as otherwise provided by law. Such records shall be accessible to
(a) the subject, except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this
section, (b) the subject's legal counsel, (c) the subject's guardian or
conservator, if any, (d) the mental health board having jurisdiction over
the subject, (e) persons authorized by an order of a judge or court, (f)
persons authorized by written permission of the subject, (g) agents or
employees of the Department of Health and Human Services upon delivery of
a subpoena from the department in connection with a licensing or
licensure investigation by the department, (h) individuals authorized to
receive notice of the release of a sex offender pursuant to section
83-174, (i) the Nebraska State Patrol or the department pursuant to
-31-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
section 69-2409.01, (j) the Department of Correctional Services Division
of Parole Supervision if the subject meets the requirements for lifetime
community supervision pursuant to section 83-174.03, and (k) any tribal
court having jurisdiction over a subject who is domiciled in Indian
country and committed for treatment as provided in section 71-964.
(2) Upon application by the county attorney or by the administrator
of the treatment facility where the subject is in custody and upon a
showing of good cause therefor, a judge of the district court of the
county where the mental health board proceedings were held or of the
county where the treatment facility is located may order that the records
not be made available to the subject if, in the judgment of the court,
the availability of such records to the subject will adversely affect his
or her mental illness or personality disorder and the treatment thereof.
(3) When a subject is absent without authorization from a treatment
facility or program described in section 71-939 or 71-1223 and is
considered to be dangerous to others, the subject's name and description
and a statement that the subject is believed to be considered dangerous
to others may be disclosed in order to aid in the subject's apprehension
and to warn the public of such danger.
Sec. 31. Section 71-3426, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-3426 (1) A lead organization may establish a local team for the
lead organization's jurisdiction or for a group of cities, counties, or
districts, pursuant to an agreement between multiple lead organizations.
If multiple lead organizations decide to form a local team, only one
shall fulfill the role of lead organization. The lead organization shall
select the members of the local team.
(2) A local team shall consist of the core members that may include
one or more members from the following backgrounds:
(a) Officials from the lead organization or from another local
public health department or such officials' designees;
-32-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
(b) Behavioral health providers or officials;
(c) Law enforcement personnel;
(d) Representatives of jails or detention centers;
(e) The coroner or the coroner's designee;
(f) Health care providers who specialize in the prevention,
diagnosis, and treatment of substance use disorders;
(g) Mental health providers who specialize in substance use
disorders;
(h) Representatives of emergency medical services providers in the
county;
(i) The Director of Children and Family Services of the Division of
Children and Family Services of the Department of Health and Human
Services or the director's designee; and
(j) Representatives from the Board of Parole, the Office of
Probation Administration, the Department of Correctional Services
Division of Parole Supervision, or the Community Corrections Division of
the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice.
(3) A local team may also include, either as permanent or temporary
members:
(a) A local school superintendent or the superintendent's designee;
(b) A representative of a local hospital;
(c) A health care provider who specializes in emergency medicine;
(d) A health care provider who specializes in pain management;
(e) A pharmacist with a background in prescription drug misuse and
diversion;
(f) A substance use disorder treatment provider from a licensed
substance use disorder treatment program;
(g) A poison control center representative;
(h) A mental health provider who is a generalist;
(i) A prescription drug monitoring program administrator or such
administrator's designee;
-33-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
(j) A representative from a harm reduction provider;
(k) A recovery coach, peer support worker, or other representative
of the recovery community;
(l) A representative from the local drug court; and
(m) Any other individual necessary for the work of the local team.
(4) The lead organization shall select a chairperson for the local
team. The chairperson shall be an official of the lead organization or
such official's designee. The chairperson shall:
(a) Solicit and recruit members and appoint replacement members to
fill vacancies that may arise on the team. In carrying out this
responsibility, the chairperson shall, at a minimum, attempt to appoint
at least one member from each of the backgrounds or positions described
in subsection (2) of this section;
(b) Facilitate local team meetings and implement the protocols and
procedures of the local team;
(c) Request and collect the records and information needed for the
local team's case review. The chairperson shall remove all personal
identifying information from any records or information prior to
providing it to the local team;
(d) Gather, store, and distribute the necessary records and
information for reviews conducted by the team. The chairperson shall
carry out such duties in compliance with all local, state, and federal
confidentiality laws and regulations;
(e) Ensure that team members receive timely notification of upcoming
meetings;
(f) Ensure the team fulfills the requirements of section 71-3427 to
publish an annual report, including recommendations to prevent future
drug overdose deaths;
(g) Ensure that all members of the local team and all guest
observers and participants sign confidentiality forms as required under
section 71-3433;
-34-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
(h) Oversee compliance with the Overdose Fatality Review Teams Act
and the protocols developed by the team;
(i) Serve as a liaison for the local team; and
(j) Perform such other duties as the team deems appropriate.
(5) Members of the local team shall not receive compensation for
their services as team members.
Sec. 32. Section 71-3430, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-3430 (1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, on
written request of the lead organization, and as necessary to carry out
the purpose and duties of the local team, the lead organization shall be
provided with the following information:
(a) Nonprivileged information and records regarding the physical
health, mental health, and treatment for any substance use disorder
maintained by a health care provider, substance use disorder treatment
provider, hospital, or health system for an individual whose death is
being reviewed by the local team; and
(b) Information and records maintained by a state or local
government agency or entity, including, but not limited to, death
investigative information, coroner investigative information, law
enforcement investigative information, emergency medical services
reports, fire department records, prosecutorial records, parole and
probation information and records, court records, school records, and
information and records of a social services agency, including the
department, if the agency or entity provided services to an individual
whose death is being reviewed by the local team.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the
following persons shall comply with a records request by the lead
organization made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section:
(a) A coroner;
(b) A fire department;
-35-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
(c) A health system;
(d) A hospital;
(e) A law enforcement agency;
(f) A local or state governmental agency, including, but not limited
to, the department, local public health authorities, the Attorney
General, county attorneys, public defenders, the Commission on Public
Advocacy, the Department of Correctional Services, and the Office of
Probation Administration , and the Division of Parole Supervision;
(g) A mental health provider;
(h) A health care provider;
(i) A substance use disorder treatment provider;
(j) A school, including a public or private elementary, secondary,
or postsecondary institution;
(k) An emergency medical services provider;
(l) A social services provider; and
(m) Any other person who is in possession of records pertinent to
the local team's investigation of an overdose fatality.
(3) A person subject to a records request by a lead organization
under subsection (1) of this section may charge the lead organization a
reasonable fee for the service of duplicating any records requested by
the lead organization, not to exceed the actual cost of duplication.
(4)(a) Compliance with any records request under this section is
subject to the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability
Act of 1996, Public Law 104-191, and regulations promulgated thereunder;
42 U.S.C. 290dd-2; 42 C.F.R. part 2; and the Child Protection and Family
Safety Act.
(b) The department is not required to comply with a records request
under subsection (2) of this section to the extent the information
requested:
(i) Was obtained by the prescription drug monitoring program created
under section 71-2454;
-36-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
(ii) Is covered by section 68-313; or
(iii) Is covered by 42 C.F.R. 431.300 et seq.
(c) The disclosure or redisclosure of a medical record developed in
connection with the provision of substance abuse treatment services,
without the authorization of a person in interest, is subject to any
limitations that exist under the federal Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act of 1996, Public Law 104-191, and regulations
promulgated thereunder; 42 U.S.C. 290dd-2; and 42 C.F.R. part 2.
(5) Information requested by the lead organization shall be provided
within thirty calendar days after receipt of the written request, unless
an extension is granted by the chairperson. Written request includes a
request submitted via email or facsimile transmission.
(6)(a) A county attorney or the Attorney General may, upon request
by a lead organization, issue subpoenas to compel production of any of
the records and information specified in this section.
(b) Any willful failure to comply with such a subpoena may be
certified by the county attorney or Attorney General to the district
court for enforcement or punishment for contempt of court.
Sec. 33. Section 81-1401, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1401 For purposes of sections 81-1401 to 81-1414.19, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) Class I railroad means a rail carrier classified as Class I
pursuant to 49 C.F.R. part 1201 1-1;
(2) Commission means the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and
Criminal Justice;
(3) Council means the Nebraska Police Standards Advisory Council;
(4) Director means the director of the Nebraska Law Enforcement
Training Center;
(5) Felony means a crime punishable by imprisonment for a term of
more than one year or a crime committed outside of Nebraska which would
-37-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
be punishable by imprisonment for a term of more than one year if
committed in Nebraska;
(6) Handgun means any firearm with a barrel less than sixteen inches
in length or any firearm designed to be held and fired by the use of a
single hand;
(7) Law enforcement agency means the police department or the town
marshal in incorporated municipalities, the office of sheriff in
unincorporated areas, the Nebraska State Patrol, and Class I railroad
police departments;
(8)(a) Law enforcement officer means any person who has successfully
completed an entry-level law enforcement certification from a training
academy and who is responsible for the prevention or detection of crime
or the enforcement of the penal, traffic, or highway laws of the state or
any political subdivision of the state for more than one hundred hours
per year and is authorized by law to make arrests and includes, but is
not limited to:
(i) A full-time or part-time member of the Nebraska State Patrol;
(ii) A county sheriff;
(iii) A full-time or part-time employee of a county sheriff's
office;
(iv) A full-time or part-time employee of a municipal or village
police agency;
(v) A full-time or part-time Game and Parks Commission conservation
officer;
(vi) A full-time or part-time deputy state sheriff;
(vii) A full-time employee of an organized and paid fire department
of any city of the metropolitan class who is an authorized arson
investigator and whose duties consist of determining the cause, origin,
and circumstances of fires or explosions while on duty in the course of
an investigation;
(viii) A member of a law enforcement reserve force appointed in
-38-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
accordance with section 81-1438; or
(ix) A full-time Class I railroad police officer;
(b) Law enforcement officer includes a noncertified conditional
officer;
(c) Law enforcement officer does not include employees of the
Department of Correctional Services, probation officers under the
Nebraska Probation System, parole officers appointed by the Director of
Correctional Supervision and Services of the Division of Parole
Supervision, or employees of the Department of Revenue under section
77-366; and
(d) Except for a noncertified conditional officer, a law enforcement
officer shall possess a valid law enforcement officer certificate or
diploma, as established by the council, in order to be vested with the
authority of this section;
(9) Misdemeanor crime of domestic violence has the same meaning as
in section 28-1206;
(10) Noncertified conditional officer means a person appointed
pursuant to subsection (6) of section 81-1414;
(11) Serious misconduct means improper or illegal actions taken by a
law enforcement officer that have a rational connection with the person's
fitness or capacity to serve as a law enforcement officer and includes,
but is not limited to:
(a) Conviction of a felony or misdemeanor crime of domestic
violence;
(b) Fabrication of evidence;
(c) Repeated substantiated allegations of the use of excessive
force;
(d) Acceptance of a bribe;
(e) Commission of fraud or perjury; or
(f) Sexual assault;
(12) Training academy means:
-39-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
(a) The training center; or
(b) Another council-approved law enforcement training facility
which:
(i) Offers certification training that meets or exceeds the
certification training curriculum of the training center; and
(ii) Is operated and maintained by a law enforcement agency or by
multiple law enforcement agencies pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation
Act;
(13) Training center means the Nebraska Law Enforcement Training
Center; and
(14) Training school means a public or private institution of higher
education, including the University of Nebraska, the Nebraska state
colleges, and the community colleges of this state, that offers training
in a council-approved pre-certification course.
Sec. 34. Section 83-170, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-170 As used in the Nebraska Treatment and Corrections Act, unless
the context otherwise requires:
(1) Board means the Board of Parole;
(2) Committed offender means any person who, under any provision of
law, is sentenced or committed to a facility operated by the department
or is sentenced or committed to the department other than a person
adjudged to be as described in subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b), or (4) of
section 43-247 by a juvenile court;
(3) Department means the Department of Correctional Services;
(4) Director means the Director of Correctional Services;
(5) Director of Supervision and Services means the Director of
Supervision and Services appointed pursuant to section 83-1,101;
(5) (6) Facility means any prison, reformatory, training school,
reception center, community guidance center, group home, or other
institution operated by the department;
-40-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
(6) (7) Good time means any reduction of sentence granted pursuant
to sections 83-1,107 and 83-1,108;
(7) (8) Maximum term means the maximum sentence provided by law or
the maximum sentence imposed by a court, whichever is shorter;
(8) (9) Minimum term means the minimum sentence provided by law or
the minimum sentence imposed by a court, whichever is longer;
(9) (10) Pardon authority means the power to remit fines and
forfeitures and to grant respites, reprieves, pardons, or commutations;
(10) (11) Parole term means the time from release on parole to the
completion of the maximum term, reduced by good time;
(11) (12) Person committed to the department means any person
sentenced or committed to a facility within the department;
(12) (13) Restrictive housing means conditions of confinement that
provide limited contact with other offenders, strictly controlled
movement while out of cell, and out-of-cell time of less than twenty-four
hours per week; and
(13) (14) Solitary confinement means the status of confinement of an
inmate in an individual cell having solid, soundproof doors and which
deprives the inmate of all visual and auditory contact with other
persons.
Sec. 35. Section 83-171, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-171 There is hereby created a Department of Correctional Services
which shall:
(1) Maintain and administer facilities required for the custody,
control, correctional treatment, and rehabilitation of persons committed
to the department and for the safekeeping of such other persons as may be
remanded to the department in accordance with law;
(2) Develop policies and programs for the correctional treatment and
rehabilitation of persons committed to the department;
(3) Supervise parolees who have been committed to the department;
-41-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
and
(4) Administer parole services in the facilities and in the
community; and .
(5) Maintain all records and files associated with the Board of
Parole, including relating to individuals subject to lifetime community
supervision under section 83-174.03. This section shall not be construed
to prohibit the department from maintaining daily records and files
associated with the Board of Pardons.
Sec. 36. Section 83-171.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-171.01 The department and the Division of Parole Supervision
shall establish performance metrics for corrections and parole staff.
Such metrics shall measure staff efficacy in providing rehabilitative and
reentry services to committed offenders and parolees. Such metrics shall:
(1) Reflect a balanced approach that considers both compliance and
enforcement measures as well as outcomes related to rehabilitation,
reintegration, and public safety;
(2) Include indicators of progress for committed offenders and
parolees, such as successful completion of treatment programs,
educational attainment, employment status, and compliance with conditions
of supervision;
(3) Emphasize the importance of providing supportive services,
fostering positive relationships with committed offenders and parolees,
and promoting successful community reentry; and
(4) Be aligned with best practices, stakeholder input, and the
evolving goals and priorities of the criminal justice system.
Sec. 37. Section 83-173, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-173 The Director of Correctional Services shall:
(1) Supervise and be responsible for the administration of the
Department of Correctional Services;
-42-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
(2) Establish, consolidate, or abolish any administrative
subdivision within the department and appoint and remove for cause the
heads thereof and delegate appropriate powers and duties to them;
(3) Establish and administer policies and programs for the operation
of the facilities in the department and for the custody, control, safety,
correction, and rehabilitation of persons committed to the department;
(4) Appoint and remove the chief executive officer of each facility
and delegate appropriate powers and duties to him or her;
(5) Appoint and remove employees of the department and delegate
appropriate powers and duties to them;
(6) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the management,
correctional treatment, and rehabilitation of persons committed to the
department, the administration of facilities, and the conduct of officers
and employees under his or her jurisdiction;
(7) Designate the place of confinement of persons committed to the
department subject to section 83-176;
(8) Establish and administer policies that ensure that complete and
up-to-date electronic records are maintained for each person committed to
the department and which also ensure privacy protections. Electronic
records shall include programming recommendations, program completions,
time spent in housing other than general population, and medical records,
including mental and behavioral health records;
(9) Collect, develop, and maintain statistical information
concerning persons committed to the department, sentencing practices, and
correctional treatment as may be useful in penological research or in the
development of treatment programs;
(10) Provide training programs designed to equip employees for duty
in the facilities and related services of the department and to raise and
maintain the educational standards, level of performance, and safety of
such employees;
(11) Notify law enforcement agencies of upcoming furloughs as
-43-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
required by section 83-173.01;
(12) Issue or authorize the issuance of a warrant for the arrest of
any person committed to the department who has escaped from the custody
of the department; and
(13) Supervise and be responsible for administration of parole
services in the community, including administration of the Community Work
Release and Reentry Centers Act;
(14) Establish and maintain policies, standards, and procedures for
the field parole service and the community supervision of sex offenders
pursuant to section 83-174.03;
(15) Divide the state into parole districts and appoint district
parole officers and such other employees as may be required to carry out
adequate parole supervision of all parolees, prescribe their powers and
duties, and obtain division offices for staff in each district as may be
necessary;
(16) Cooperate with the Board of Parole, the courts, the Community
Corrections Division of the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and
Criminal Justice, and all other agencies, public and private, which are
concerned with the treatment or welfare of persons on parole;
(17) Provide the Board of Parole and district judges with any record
of a parolee that the board or such judges may require;
(18) Make recommendations to the Board of Parole or district judge
in cases of violation of the conditions of parole, issue warrants for the
arrest of parole violators when so instructed by the board or district
judge, and upon instruction of the board, issue certificates of parole
and of parole revocation to the facilities and certificates of discharge
from parole to parolees;
(19) Organize and conduct training programs for the district parole
officers and other employees;
(20) Use the funds provided under section 83-1,107.02 to augment
operational or personnel costs associated with the development,
-44-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
implementation, and evaluation of enhanced parole-based programs and
purchase services to provide such programs aimed at enhancing adult
parolee supervision in the community and treatment needs of parolees.
Such enhanced parole-based programs include, but are not limited to,
specialized units of supervision, related equipment purchases and
training, and programs that address a parolee's vocational, educational,
mental health, behavioral, or substance abuse treatment needs, including
evidence-based peer and family support programs;
(21) Ensure that any risk or needs assessment instrument utilized by
the department be periodically validated;
(22) Each January 1, report to the Governor and electronically to
the Clerk of the Legislature the number of parole revocations and the
number of technical violations of parole;
(23) Take all actions necessary to assist the board in carrying out
its duties under section 83-962 during a correctional system overcrowding
emergency;
(24) Administer the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender
Supervision; and
(25) (13) Exercise all powers and perform all duties necessary and
proper in carrying out his or her responsibilities.
Sec. 38. Section 83-174.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-174.03 (1) Any individual who, on or after July 14, 2006, (a) is
convicted of or completes a term of incarceration for a registrable
offense under section 29-4003 and has a previous conviction for a
registrable offense under such section, (b) is convicted of sexual
assault of a child in the first degree pursuant to section 28-319.01, or
(c) is convicted of or completes a term of incarceration for an
aggravated offense as defined in section 29-4001.01, shall, upon
completion of his or her term of incarceration or release from civil
commitment, be supervised in the community by the department Division of
-45-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
Parole Supervision for the remainder of his or her life.
(2) Notice shall be provided to the department division by an agency
or political subdivision which has custody of an individual required to
be supervised in the community pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
at least sixty days prior to the release of such individual from custody.
(3) Individuals required to be supervised in the community pursuant
to subsection (1) of this section shall undergo a risk assessment and
evaluation by the department division to determine the conditions of
community supervision to be imposed to best protect the public from the
risk that the individual will reoffend.
(4) Conditions of community supervision imposed on an individual by
the department division may include the following:
(a) Drug and alcohol testing if the conviction resulting in the
imposition of community supervision involved the use of drugs or alcohol;
(b) Restrictions on employment and leisure activities necessary to
minimize interaction with potential victims;
(c) Requirements to report regularly to the individual's community
supervision officer;
(d) Requirements to reside at a specified location and notify the
individual's community supervision officer of any change in address or
employment;
(e) A requirement to allow the department division access to medical
records from the individual's current and former providers of treatment;
(f) A requirement that the individual submit himself or herself to
available medical, psychological, psychiatric, or other treatment,
including, but not limited to, polygraph examinations; or
(g) Any other conditions designed to minimize the risk of
recidivism, including, but not limited to, the use of electronic
monitoring, which are not unduly restrictive.
Sec. 39. Section 83-174.04, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-46-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
83-174.04 An individual who violates one or more of the conditions
of community supervision established for him or her pursuant to section
83-174.03 shall undergo a review by the department Division of Parole
Supervision to evaluate the risk posed to the public by the violation in
question. The department division may take any of the following actions
in response to a violation of conditions of community supervision:
(1) Revise or impose additional conditions of community supervision
in order to minimize the risk to the public from the continued presence
of the individual in the community;
(2) Forward to the Attorney General or the county attorney in the
county where the individual resides a request to initiate a criminal
prosecution for failure to comply with the terms of community
supervision; or
(3) Forward to the county attorney or Attorney General a
recommendation that civil commitment proceedings be instituted with
respect to the individual.
Sec. 40. Section 83-174.05, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-174.05 Failure to comply with the conditions of community
supervision imposed by the department Division of Parole Supervision is a
Class IV felony for the first offense and a Class III felony for any
subsequent offense.
Sec. 41. Section 83-192, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-192 (1) The Board of Parole shall:
(a) Determine the time of release on parole of committed offenders
eligible for such release;
(b) Fix the conditions of parole, revoke parole, issue or authorize
the issuance of warrants for the arrest of parole violators, and impose
other sanctions short of revocation for violation of conditions of
parole;
-47-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
(c) Determine the time of mandatory discharge from parole;
(d) Visit and inspect any facility, state or local, for the
detention of persons charged with or convicted of an offense and for the
safekeeping of such other persons as may be remanded to such facility in
accordance with law;
(e) Implement Within two years after July 1, 2006, implement the
utilization of a validated risk and needs assessment in coordination with
the Department of Correctional Services and the Division of Parole
Supervision. The assessment shall be prepared and completed by the
department or the division for use by the board in determining release on
parole;
(f) Review the record of every parole-eligible committed offender
annually when he or she is within three years of his or her earliest
parole eligibility date.
The review schedule shall be based on court-imposed sentences or
statutory minimum sentences, whichever are greater. The board is not
required to review the record of a committed offender when the committed
offender's parole eligibility date is within one month of his or her
mandatory discharge date. Nothing in such schedule shall prohibit the
board from reviewing a committed offender's case at any time;
(g) Appoint and remove all employees of the board as prescribed by
the State Personnel System and delegate appropriate powers and duties to
them;
(h) Carry out its duties under section 83-962 during a correctional
system overcrowding emergency;
(i) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations; and
(j) Exercise all powers and perform all duties necessary and proper
in carrying out its responsibilities under the Nebraska Treatment and
Corrections Act.
(2) The chairperson of the board shall:
(a) Supervise the administration and operation of the board;
-48-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
(b) Serve in an advisory capacity to the director in administering
parole services within any facility;
(c) Interpret the parole program to the public with a view toward
developing a broad base of public support;
(d) Conduct research for the purpose of evaluating and improving the
effectiveness of the parole system;
(e) Recommend parole legislation to the Governor;
(f) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the
administration and operation of the board;
(g) Take all actions necessary to assist the board in carrying out
its duties under section 83-962 during a correctional system overcrowding
emergency; and
(h) Exercise all other powers and perform all other duties necessary
and proper in carrying out his or her responsibilities as chairperson.
(3) This section does not prohibit a committed offender from
requesting that the board review his or her record. The board is not
required to review a committed offender's record more than once a year,
except as otherwise required by statute, including section 83-962.
Sec. 42. Section 83-1,100, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1,100 (1) There is hereby created the Division of Parole
Supervision within the department. The employees of the division shall
consist of the Director of Supervision and Services, the field parole
service officers, and all other division staff. The division shall be
responsible for the following:
(a) The administration of parole services in the community,
including administration of the Community Work Release and Reentry
Centers Act;
(b) The maintenance of all records and files associated with the
Board of Parole;
(c) The daily supervision and training of staff members of the
-49-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
division, including training regarding evidence-based practices in
supervision pursuant to section 83-1,100.02; and
(d) The assessment, evaluation, and supervision of individuals who
are subject to parole supervision, including lifetime community
supervision pursuant to section 83-174.03.
(2) Parole officers shall be compensated with salaries substantially
equal to other state employees who have similar responsibilities,
including employees of the Office of Probation Administration. This
section subsection shall apply only to field parole service officers and
support staff and shall not apply to the director Director of Supervision
and Services or any other management-level position.
(3) This section does not prohibit the division from maintaining
daily records and files associated with the Board of Pardons.
Sec. 43. Section 83-1,100.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
83-1,100.02 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Levels of supervision means the determination of the following
for each person on parole:
(i) Supervision contact requirements, including the frequency,
location, methods, and nature of contact with the parole officer;
(ii) Substance abuse testing requirements and frequency;
(iii) Contact restrictions;
(iv) Curfew restrictions;
(v) Access to available programs and treatment, with priority given
to moderate-risk and high-risk parolees; and
(vi) Severity of graduated responses to violations of supervision
conditions;
(b) Responsivity factors means characteristics of a parolee that
affect the parolee's ability to respond favorably or unfavorably to any
treatment goals; and
(c) Risk and needs assessment means an actuarial tool that has been
-50-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
validated in Nebraska to determine the likelihood of the parolee engaging
in future criminal behavior.
(2) The department Division of Parole Supervision shall establish an
evidence-based process that utilizes a risk and needs assessment to
measure criminal risk factors, specific individual needs, and
responsivity factors.
(3) The risk and needs assessment shall be performed at the
commencement of the parole term and every six months thereafter by
department division staff trained and certified in the use of the risk
and needs assessment.
(4) The validity of the risk and needs assessment shall be tested at
least every five years.
(5) Based on the results of the risk and needs assessment, the
department division shall target parolee criminal risk and need factors
by focusing sanction, program, and treatment resources on moderate-risk
and high-risk parolees.
(6) The department division shall provide training to its parole
officers on (a) use of a risk and needs assessment, (b) risk-based
supervision strategies, (c) relationship skills, (d) cognitive behavioral
interventions, (e) community-based resources, (f) criminal risk factors,
(g) targeting criminal risk factors to reduce recidivism, (h) proper use
of a matrix of administrative sanctions, custodial sanctions, and rewards
developed pursuant to section 83-1,119, and (i) addressing responsivity
factors. Each parole officer shall complete the training requirements set
forth in this subsection within one year after his or her hire date or
September 1, 2024, whichever is later.
(7) The department division shall provide training for chief parole
officers to become trainers so as to ensure long-term and self-sufficient
training capacity in the state.
Sec. 44. Section 83-1,103, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-51-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
83-1,103 The field parole service, consisting of district parole
officers working under the direction of the director Director of
Supervision and Services or district judge, shall be responsible for the
investigation, supervision, and assistance of parolees, probationers, or
individuals subject to community supervision under section 83-174.03. The
field parole service shall be sufficient in size to assure that no
district parole officer carries a case load larger than is compatible
with adequate parole investigation or supervision.
Sec. 45. Section 83-1,103.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
83-1,103.01 A parole officer assigned by the director Director of
Supervision and Services to supervise individuals subject to lifetime
community supervision pursuant to section 83-174.03 shall:
(1) Make investigations, prior to an individual subject to community
supervision being released from incarceration, in cooperation with
institutional caseworkers at prisons, mental health facilities, and
county jails, to determine the community supervision conditions necessary
to protect the public and make reasonable advance preparation for release
into the community;
(2) Assist individuals subject to community supervision to comply
with the conditions of supervision and to make a successful adjustment in
the community;
(3) Supervise individuals subject to community supervision by
keeping informed of their conduct and condition;
(4) Make reports as required by the director Director of Supervision
and Services to determine the effectiveness of community supervision in
protecting the public or the progress of an individual subject to
community supervision;
(5) Cooperate with social welfare agencies and treatment providers
to ensure that individuals subject to community supervision receive any
necessary services or treatment;
-52-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
(6) Inform the director Director of Supervision and Services when,
in the opinion of the community supervision officer, an individual is in
violation of the conditions of his or her community supervision, and
whenever necessary exercise the power of arrest as provided in section
83-173 83-1,102;
(7) Conduct periodic reviews of the conditions of community
supervision imposed on an individual as required by the director Director
of Supervision and Services; and
(8) Exercise all powers and perform all duties necessary and proper
in carrying out his or her responsibilities.
Sec. 46. Section 83-1,103.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
83-1,103.02 (1) Prior to the release from incarceration of an
individual subject to lifetime community supervision pursuant to section
83-174.03, the department Division of Parole Supervision shall:
(a) Notify the individual in writing that he or she is subject to
community supervision upon completion of his or her criminal sentence;
(b) Inform the individual subject to community supervision of the
process by which conditions of community supervision are determined and
his or her right to submit relevant information to the department
division for consideration when establishing the conditions of
supervision;
(c) Determine the individual's risk of recidivism if released into
the community, utilizing a validated risk assessment tool;
(d) After considering the information required in subdivision (e) of
this subsection, determine the conditions of supervision which will most
effectively minimize the risk of the individual committing another sex
offense. The conditions shall be the least restrictive conditions
available, in terms of the effect on the individual's personal freedom,
which minimize the risk of recidivism and are compatible with public
safety; and
-53-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
(e) In determining the conditions of supervision to be imposed, the
department division shall consider the following:
(i) A report prepared by the institutional caseworkers relating to
the individual's personality, social history, and adjustment to authority
and including any recommendations which the staff of the facility may
make;
(ii) All official reports of the individual's prior criminal record,
including reports and records of earlier probation and parole
experiences;
(iii) The presentence investigation report;
(iv) The reports of any physical, mental, and psychiatric
examinations of the individual;
(v) Any relevant information which may be submitted by the
individual, his or her attorney, the victim of the crime, or other
persons; and
(vi) Such other relevant information concerning the individual as
may be reasonably available.
(2) Upon completion of the risk assessment and the determination of
the conditions of community supervision and no later than thirty days
prior to the completion of the individual's criminal sentence, the
department division shall issue a certificate of community supervision to
the individual containing the conditions of community supervision he or
she will be required to comply with upon the completion of his or her
criminal sentence. The director Director of Supervision and Services
shall include with the certificate written information on how to appeal
the determination of the conditions of community supervision.
Sec. 47. Section 83-1,103.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
83-1,103.03 (1) The department Division of Parole Supervision shall
review the conditions of community supervision imposed on an individual
pursuant to section 83-174.03 on an annual basis and shall provide the
-54-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
individual the opportunity to submit written materials to the department
division for consideration during such review.
(2) If the department division determines, after reviewing the
individual's conduct while under supervision and any other relevant
facts, that one or more of the conditions of community supervision
imposed upon the individual is no longer necessary to reduce the risk of
the individual reoffending or is no longer the least restrictive
condition compatible with public safety, the department division shall
revise the conditions of community supervision so that the individual's
freedom is not unnecessarily restricted.
Sec. 48. Section 83-1,103.04, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
83-1,103.04 (1) Whenever a determination or revision of the
conditions of community supervision is made by the department Division of
Parole Supervision, the individual subject to the conditions shall be
entitled to an appeal. The appeal shall be heard by the district court in
the county where the individual resides. The individual shall be informed
of his or her right to request counsel, and if counsel is requested the
court shall determine if the individual is indigent. If the court finds
the individual to be indigent, it shall appoint counsel from the public
defender's office to represent the individual during the appeal.
(2) In an appeal contesting the determination or revision of the
conditions of community supervision, the burden of proof shall be on the
individual subject to community supervision to show by clear and
convincing evidence (a) that the conditions in question will not reduce
the risk of the individual reoffending or otherwise protect the public or
(b) that the condition is overly restrictive of the individual's freedom
and a less restrictive condition is available which is equally or more
effective in reducing the risk of the individual reoffending.
Sec. 49. Section 83-1,104, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-55-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
83-1,104 A district parole officer shall:
(1) Make investigations, prior to a committed offender's release on
parole, in cooperation with institutional caseworkers and the Board of
Parole to determine the adequacy of parole plans and make reasonable
advance preparation for release on parole;
(2) Assist a committed offender who requests assistance prior to
release or a parolee to comply with the conditions of parole and to make
a successful adjustment in the community, including facilitating the
transitional needs of housing and employment, access to and participation
in job training services in the community, access to mental health
services, assisting with applications for health care coverage or
ensuring that the committed offender or parolee knows how to apply for
and obtain health care coverage, and assisting with enrollment in the
medical assistance program established pursuant to the Medical Assistance
Act, if eligible, to ensure that the committed offender or parolee has
access to such program close to the time of release or soon thereafter;
(3) Supervise parolees by keeping informed of their conduct and
condition, utilizing global positioning systems and other monitoring
technology as needed during the period of supervision;
(4) Make such reports as required by the director Director of
Supervision and Services or district judge to determine the effectiveness
of the parole system or the progress of an individual parolee;
(5) Cooperate with social welfare agencies;
(6) Observe the work of any parole officer under his or her
supervision from time to time;
(7) Inform the director Director of Supervision and Services when,
in his or her opinion, any eligible parolee's conduct and attitude
warrant his or her discharge from active supervision, or when any
parolee's violation of the conditions of parole is of sufficient
seriousness to require action by the Board of Parole or district judge
and whenever necessary exercise the power of arrest as provided in
-56-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
section 83-1,119;
(8) Delegate in his or her discretion any of the above
responsibilities to a parole officer under his or her supervision; and
(9) Exercise all powers and perform all duties necessary and proper
in carrying out his or her responsibilities.
Sec. 50. Section 83-1,107, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1,107 (1)(a) Within sixty days after initial classification and
assignment of any offender committed to the department, all available
information regarding such committed offender shall be reviewed and a
committed offender department-approved personalized program plan document
shall be drawn up. The document shall specifically describe the
department-approved personalized program plan and the specific goals the
department expects the committed offender to achieve. The document shall
also contain a realistic schedule for completion of the department-
approved personalized program plan. The department-approved personalized
program plan shall be developed with the active participation of the
committed offender. The department shall provide programs to allow
compliance by the committed offender with the department-approved
personalized program plan.
Programming may include, but is not limited to:
(i) Academic and vocational education, including teaching such
classes by qualified offenders;
(ii) Substance abuse treatment;
(iii) Mental health and psychiatric treatment, including criminal
personality programming;
(iv) Constructive, meaningful work programs; and
(v) Any other program deemed necessary and appropriate by the
department.
(b) A modification in the department-approved personalized program
plan may be made to account for the increased or decreased abilities of
-57-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
the committed offender or the availability of any program. Any
modification shall be made only after notice is given to the committed
offender. The department may not impose disciplinary action upon any
committed offender solely because of the committed offender's failure to
comply with the department-approved personalized program plan, but such
failure may be considered by the board in its deliberations on whether or
not to grant parole to a committed offender.
(2)(a) The department shall reduce the term of a committed offender
by six months for each year of the offender's term and pro rata for any
part thereof which is less than a year.
(b) In addition to reductions granted in subdivision (2)(a) of this
section, the department shall reduce the term of a committed offender by
three days on the first day of each month following a twelve-month period
of incarceration within the department during which the offender has not
been found guilty of (i) a Class I or Class II offense or (ii) more than
three Class III offenses under the department's disciplinary code.
Reductions earned under this subdivision shall not be subject to forfeit
or withholding by the department.
(c) The total reductions under this subsection shall be credited
from the date of sentence, which shall include any term of confinement
prior to sentence and commitment as provided pursuant to section
83-1,106, and shall be deducted from the maximum term, to determine the
date when discharge from the custody of the state becomes mandatory.
(3) While the offender is in the custody of the department,
reductions of terms granted pursuant to subdivision (2)(a) of this
section may be forfeited, withheld, and restored by the chief executive
officer of the facility with the approval of the director after the
offender has been notified regarding the charges of misconduct.
(4) The department, in consultation with the board, shall ensure
that a release or reentry plan is complete or near completion when the
offender has served at least eighty percent of his or her sentence. For
-58-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
purposes of this subsection, release or reentry plan means a
comprehensive and individualized strategic plan to ensure an individual's
safe and effective transition or reentry into the community to which he
or she resides with the primary goal of reducing recidivism. At a
minimum, the release or reentry plan shall include, but not be limited
to, consideration of the individual's housing needs, medical or mental
health care needs, and transportation and job needs and shall address an
individual's barriers to successful release or reentry in order to
prevent recidivism. The release or reentry plan does not include an
individual's programming needs included in the individual's personalized
program plan for use inside the prison. However, the department shall
include in the release or reentry plan information regarding the
individual's progress on the individual's personalized program plan for
use inside the prison.
(5)(a) The department shall make treatment programming available to
committed offenders as provided in section 83-1,110.01 and shall include
continuing participation in such programming as part of each offender's
department-approved personalized program plan developed under subsection
(1) of this section.
(b) Any committed offender with a mental illness shall be provided
with the community standard of mental health care. The mental health care
shall utilize evidence-based therapy models that include an evaluation
component to track the effectiveness of interventions.
(c) Any committed offender with a mental illness shall be evaluated
before release to ensure that adequate monitoring and treatment of the
committed offender will take place or, if appropriate, that a commitment
proceeding under the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act or the Sex
Offender Commitment Act will take place.
(6)(a) Within thirty days after any committed offender has been
paroled, all available information regarding such parolee shall be
reviewed and a case plan document shall be drawn up and approved by the
-59-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
department Division of Parole Supervision. The document shall
specifically describe the approved case plan and the specific goals the
department division expects the parolee to achieve. The document shall
also contain a realistic schedule for completion of the approved case
plan. The approved case plan shall be developed with the active
participation of the parolee. During the term of parole, the parolee
shall comply with the approved case plan and the department division
shall provide programs to allow compliance by the parolee with the
approved case plan.
Programming may include, but is not limited to:
(i) Academic and vocational education;
(ii) Substance abuse treatment;
(iii) Mental health and psychiatric treatment, including criminal
personality programming;
(iv) Constructive, meaningful work programs;
(v) Community service programs; and
(vi) Any other program deemed necessary and appropriate by the
department division.
(b) A modification in the approved case plan may be made to account
for the increased or decreased abilities of the parolee or the
availability of any program. Any modification shall be made only after
notice is given to the parolee. Intentional failure to comply with the
approved case plan by any parolee as scheduled for any year, or pro rata
part thereof, shall cause disciplinary action to be taken by the
department division resulting in the forfeiture of up to a maximum of
three months' good time for the scheduled year.
(7) While the offender is in the custody of the board, reductions of
terms granted pursuant to subdivision (2)(a) of this section may be
forfeited, withheld, and restored by the director upon the recommendation
of the board after the offender has been notified regarding the charges
of misconduct or breach of the conditions of parole.
-60-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
(8) Good time or other reductions of sentence granted under the
provisions of any law prior to July 1, 1996, may be forfeited, withheld,
or restored in accordance with the terms of the Nebraska Treatment and
Corrections Act.
(9) Pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by the probation
administrator and the director, an individualized post-release
supervision plan shall be collaboratively prepared by the Office of
Probation Administration and the department and provided to the court to
prepare individuals under custody of the department for post-release
supervision. All records created during the period of incarceration shall
be shared with the Office of Probation Administration and considered in
preparation of the post-release supervision plan.
Sec. 51. Section 83-1,107.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
83-1,107.01 (1) Unless otherwise provided by this section, whenever
an adult offender is paroled, the board shall require a parolee to pay a
monthly parole programming fee.
(2) Parolees under the supervision of the department Division of
Parole Supervision shall pay a monthly parole programming fee of twenty-
five dollars, not later than the tenth day of each month, beginning the
second month of parole supervision and continuing for the duration of the
parole.
(3) The board shall waive payment of the monthly parole programming
fee in whole or in part if after a hearing a determination is made that
such payment would constitute an undue hardship on the parolee due to
limited income, employment or school status, or physical or mental
handicap. Such waiver shall be in effect only during the period of time
that the parolee is unable to pay his or her monthly parole programming
fee.
(4) When monthly parole programming fees are waived, in whole or in
part, the parole officer, pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by
-61-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
the board, may contract with the parolee to perform approved community
service at the rate of five dollars per hour in lieu of payment of
monthly parole programming fees. A parolee may be required to pay a
participation fee in order to take advantage of community service
programs. A parolee may not accumulate more than three months' advance
credit for community service. The use of community service alternatives
does not preclude the imposition of other intermediate measures.
(5) The department, division with the approval of the Board of
Parole, shall implement sanctions if a parolee defaults in the payment of
monthly parole programming fees or any installment thereof as established
by subsection (2) of this section, except that parole shall not be
revoked nor shall the parolee be imprisoned for such nonpayment if the
parolee is financially unable to make the payment.
(6) If the board determines that the default in payment described in
subsection (5) of this section was not attributable to a deliberate
refusal to obey the order of the board or to failure on the parolee's
part to make a good faith effort to obtain the funds required for
payment, the board may allow the parolee additional time for payment,
reduce the amount of each installment, or revoke the fees or the unpaid
portion in whole or in part.
(7) No parolee shall be required to pay more than one monthly parole
programming fee per month.
(8) The imposition of monthly parole programming fees in this
section shall be considered separate and apart from specific service
delivery fees.
(9) Any adult offender received for supervision pursuant to section
29-2637 or the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision shall be
assessed a monthly parole programming fee during the period of time the
offender is actively supervised by Nebraska parole authorities.
(10) A parolee shall pay the fees described in this section to the
department division. The department division shall remit all fees to the
-62-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
State Treasurer for credit to the Parole Program Cash Fund.
(11) The board and the department division shall adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section.
Sec. 52. Section 83-1,107.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
83-1,107.02 The Parole Program Cash Fund is created. All funds
collected pursuant to section 83-1,107.01 shall be remitted to the State
Treasurer for credit to the fund. The fund shall be utilized by the
department Division of Parole Supervision for the purposes stated in
subdivision (20) (8) of section 83-173 83-1,102. Any money in the fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 53. Section 83-1,109, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1,109 The chief executive officer of a facility shall regularly
report all good time and all forfeitures, withholdings, and restorations
of good time to the director. On the basis of such report, the director
shall inform the board and the Director of Supervision and Services of
all committed offenders who are expected to become eligible for release
on parole within the next three months.
Sec. 54. Section 83-1,118, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1,118 (1) If, in the opinion of the board, upon receipt of
information from the director Director of Supervision and Services, a
parolee has shown suitable compliance with his or her parole programming
plan, the board may reduce the level of supervision for a parolee that is
commensurate with the best interests of the parolee and is compatible
with the protection of the public.
(2) The board shall discharge a parolee from parole when the time
served in the custody of the department and the time served on parole
-63-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
equal the maximum term less good time.
(3) The department shall discharge a committed offender from the
custody of the department when the time served in the facility equals the
maximum term less good time.
(4) Upon completion of the lawful requirements of the sentence, the
department shall provide the parolee or committed offender with a written
notice regarding his or her civil rights. The notice shall inform the
parolee or committed offender that voting rights are restored upon
completion of the sentence. The notice shall also include information on
restoring other civil rights through the pardon process, including
application to and hearing by the Board of Pardons.
(5) The Board of Parole may discharge a parolee from parole when
such parolee is under the supervision of another state's correctional
institution and such offender has reached the expiration date of his or
her Nebraska parole term.
Sec. 55. Section 83-1,119, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1,119 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Absconding parole supervision means a parolee has purposely
avoided supervision for a period of at least two weeks and reasonable
efforts by a parole officer and staff to locate the parolee in person
have proven unsuccessful;
(b) Administrative sanction means additional parole requirements
imposed upon a parolee by his or her parole officer, with the full
knowledge and consent of the parolee, designed to hold the parolee
accountable for substance abuse or technical violations of conditions of
parole, including, but not limited to:
(i) Counseling or reprimand by the department Division of Parole
Supervision;
(ii) Increased supervision contact requirements;
(iii) Increased substance abuse testing;
-64-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
(iv) Referral for substance abuse or mental health evaluation or
other specialized assessment, counseling, or treatment;
(v) Imposition of a designated curfew for a period to be determined
by the department division; and
(vi) Travel restrictions to stay within his or her county of
residence or employment unless otherwise permitted by the department
division;
(c) Contract facility means a county jail that contracts with the
department to house parolees or other offenders under the jurisdiction of
the department;
(d) Substance abuse violation means a parolee's activities or
behaviors associated with the use of chemical substances or related
treatment services resulting in a violation of an original condition of
parole, including:
(i) Positive breath test for the consumption of alcohol if the
parolee is required to refrain from alcohol consumption;
(ii) Positive urinalysis for the illegal use of drugs;
(iii) Failure to report for alcohol testing or drug testing; and
(iv) Failure to appear for or complete substance abuse or mental
health treatment evaluations or inpatient or outpatient treatment; and
(e) Technical violation means a parolee's activities or behaviors
which create the opportunity for re-offending or diminish the
effectiveness of parole supervision resulting in a violation of an
original condition of parole and includes:
(i) Moving traffic violations;
(ii) Failure to report to his or her parole officer;
(iii) Leaving the state without the permission of the Board of
Parole;
(iv) Failure to work regularly or attend training or school;
(v) Failure to notify his or her parole officer of change of address
or employment;
-65-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
(vi) Frequenting places where controlled substances are illegally
sold, used, distributed, or administered; and
(vii) Failure to pay fines, court costs, restitution, or any fees
imposed pursuant to section 83-1,107.01 as directed.
Technical violation does not include absconding parole supervision.
(2) The department division shall develop a matrix of rewards for
compliance and positive behaviors and graduated administrative sanctions
and custodial sanctions for use in responding to and deterring substance
abuse violations and technical violations. A custodial sanction of thirty
days in a correctional facility or a contract facility shall be
designated as the most severe response to a violation in lieu of
revocation.
(3) Whenever a parole officer has reasonable cause to believe that a
parolee has committed or is about to commit a substance abuse violation
or technical violation while on parole, but that the parolee will not
attempt to leave the jurisdiction and will not place lives or property in
danger, the parole officer shall either:
(a) Impose one or more administrative sanctions based upon the
parolee's risk level, the severity of the violation, and the parolee's
response to the violation. If administrative sanctions are to be imposed,
the parolee shall acknowledge in writing the nature of the violation and
agree upon the administrative sanction. The parolee has the right to
decline to acknowledge the violation. If he or she declines to
acknowledge the violation, the parole officer shall take action pursuant
to subdivision (3)(b) of this section. A copy of the report shall be
submitted to the Board of Parole; or
(b) Submit a written report to the Board of Parole, outlining the
nature of the parole violation, and request the imposition of a custodial
sanction of up to thirty days in a correctional facility or a contract
facility. On the basis of the report and such further investigation as
the board may deem appropriate, the board shall determine whether and how
-66-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
the parolee violated the conditions of parole and may:
(i) Dismiss the charge of violation; or
(ii) If the board finds a violation justifying a custodial sanction,
issue a warrant if necessary and impose a custodial sanction of up to
thirty days in a correctional facility or a contract facility.
(4) Whenever a parole officer has reasonable cause to believe that a
parolee has violated or is about to violate a condition of parole by a
violation other than a substance abuse violation or a technical violation
and the parole officer has reasonable cause to believe that the parolee
will not attempt to leave the jurisdiction and will not place lives or
property in danger, the parole officer shall submit a written report to
the Board of Parole which may, on the basis of such report and such
further investigation as it may deem appropriate:
(a) Dismiss the charge of violation;
(b) Determine whether the parolee violated the conditions of his or
her parole;
(c) Impose a custodial sanction of up to thirty days in a
correctional facility or a contract facility;
(d) Revoke his or her parole in accordance with the Nebraska
Treatment and Corrections Act; or
(e) Issue a warrant for the arrest of the parolee.
(5) Whenever a parole officer has reasonable cause to believe that a
parolee has violated or is about to violate a condition of parole and
that the parolee will attempt to leave the jurisdiction or will place
lives or property in danger, the parole officer shall arrest the parolee
without a warrant and call on any peace officer to assist him or her in
doing so.
(6) Whenever a parolee is arrested with or without a warrant, he or
she shall be detained in a local jail or other detention facility
operated by the department Department of Correctional Services pending
completion of review of parole proceedings by the Board of Parole.
-67-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
Immediately after such arrest and detention, the parole officer shall
notify the Board of Parole and submit a written report of the reason for
such arrest. A complete investigation shall be made by the department
Division of Parole Supervision and submitted to the board. After prompt
consideration of such written report, the board shall order the parolee's
release from detention or continued confinement to await a final decision
on imposition of a custodial sanction or the revocation of parole.
(7) The Board of Parole shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations necessary to carry out this section.
Sec. 56. Section 83-1,122.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
83-1,122.02 (1) The department Division of Parole Supervision shall
create a pilot program to establish a technical parole violation
residential housing program. The purpose of the program is to provide
accountability and intensive support for individuals on parole who commit
technical violations, without revoking them fully back to prison.
(2) The program shall provide a structured environment for selected
individuals on parole who have committed technical violations. The
program shall be based upon a therapeutic community model. Participants
in the program shall, at a minimum, be required to take part in
counseling, educational, and other programs as the department Division of
Parole Supervision deems appropriate, to provide community service, and
to submit to drug and alcohol screening.
(3) An individual on parole shall not be placed in the pilot program
until the department Division of Parole Supervision has determined the
individual is a suitable candidate in accordance with policies and
guidelines developed by the division.
(4) On or before June 1, 2024, the Division of Parole Supervision
shall electronically submit a report to the Judiciary Committee of the
Legislature regarding the pilot program. The report shall evaluate
effects of the pilot program on recidivism and make recommendations
-68-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
regarding expansion of or changes to the program.
(4) (5) For purposes of this section, technical violation has the
same meaning as in section 83-1,119.
Sec. 57. Section 83-1,125, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1,125 (1) If a warrant or detainer is placed against a committed
offender by a court, parole agency, or other authority of this or any
other jurisdiction, the director Director of Supervision and Services
shall inquire before such offender becomes eligible for parole whether
the authority concerned intends to execute or withdraw the warrant or
detainer when the offender is released.
(2) If the authority notifies the director Director of Supervision
and Services that it intends to execute the warrant or detainer when the
offender is released, the director Director of Supervision and Services
shall advise the authority concerned of the sentence under which the
offender is held, the time of parole eligibility, any decision of the
board relating to the offender, and the nature of the offender's
adjustment during imprisonment and shall give reasonable notice to such
authority of the offender's release date.
(3) The board may parole an offender who is eligible for release to
a warrant or detainer. If an offender is paroled to such a warrant or
detainer, the board may provide, as a condition of release, that if the
charge or charges on which the warrant or detainer is based are
dismissed, or are satisfied after conviction and sentence, prior to the
expiration of the offender's parole term, the authority to whose warrant
or detainer the offender is released shall return the offender to serve
the remainder of the parole term or such part as the board may determine.
(4) If a person paroled to a warrant or detainer is thereafter
sentenced and placed on probation, or released on parole in another
jurisdiction, prior to the expiration of the parole term less good time
in this state, the board may permit the person to serve the remainder of
-69-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
the parole term or such part as the board may determine concurrently with
the person's new probation or parole term. Such concurrent terms may be
served in either of the two jurisdictions, and supervision shall be
administered in accordance with the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender
Supervision.
Sec. 58. Section 83-1,125.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
83-1,125.01 (1) The Board of Parole and the department Division of
Parole Supervision may maintain an individual file for each person who is
under the jurisdiction of the Board of Parole. Such file may be
maintained electronically and shall include, when available and
appropriate, the following information on such person:
(a) Admission summary;
(b) Presentence investigation report;
(c) Classification reports and recommendations;
(d) Official records of conviction and commitment along with any
earlier criminal records;
(e) Progress reports and admission-orientation reports;
(f) Reports of any disciplinary infractions and their disposition;
(g) Risk and needs assessments;
(h) Parole plan and parole placement and investigation worksheets;
(i) Decision guideline scores;
(j) Parole case plan;
(k) Parole progress reports and contact notes;
(l) Arrest and violation reports, including disposition;
(m) Parole proceedings orders and notices;
(n) Other documents related to parole supervision;
(o) Correspondence; and
(p) Other pertinent data concerning his or her background, conduct,
associations, and family relationships.
(2) Any decision concerning release on or revocation of parole or
-70-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
imposition of sanctions shall be made only after the individual file has
been reviewed. The contents of the individual file shall be confidential
unless disclosed in connection with a public hearing and shall not be
subject to public inspection except by court order for good cause shown.
The contents of the file shall not be accessible to any person under the
jurisdiction of the Board of Parole. A person under the jurisdiction of
the board may obtain access to his or her medical records by request to
the provider pursuant to sections 71-8401 to 71-8407 notwithstanding the
fact that such medical records may be a part of his or her parole file.
The board and the department Division of Parole Supervision have the
authority to withhold decision guideline scores, risk and needs
assessment scores, and mental health and psychological records of a
person under the jurisdiction of the board when appropriate.
(3) Nothing in this section limits in any manner the authority of
the Public Counsel to inspect and examine the records and documents of
the board and the department Division of Parole Supervision pursuant to
sections 81-8,240 to 81-8,254, except that the Public Counsel's access to
the medical or mental health records of a person under the jurisdiction
of the board shall be subject to his or her consent. The office of Public
Counsel shall not disclose the medical or mental health records of a
person under the jurisdiction of the board to anyone else, including any
other person under the jurisdiction of the board, except as authorized by
law.
(4) For any person under the jurisdiction of the Board of Parole,
the board shall provide such person's (a) name, (b) parole officer, and
(c) conditions of parole to the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement
and Criminal Justice which shall provide access to such information to
law enforcement agencies through the state's criminal justice information
system.
Sec. 59. Section 83-962, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-71-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
83-962 (1) A correctional system overcrowding emergency shall exist
whenever the director certifies that the department's inmate population
is over one hundred forty percent of operational design capacity. The
director shall so certify within thirty days after the date on which the
population first exceeds one hundred forty percent of operational design
capacity.
(2) During a correctional system overcrowding emergency, the board
shall immediately consider or reconsider committed offenders eligible for
parole who have not been released on parole.
(3) Upon such consideration or reconsideration, and for all other
consideration of committed offenders eligible for parole while the
correctional system overcrowding emergency is in effect, the board shall
order the release of each committed offender unless it is of the opinion
that such release should be deferred because:
(a) The board has determined that it is more likely than not that
the committed offender will not conform to the conditions of parole; or
(b) The board has determined that the committed offender's continued
correctional treatment, medical care, or vocational or other training in
the facility will substantially enhance the offender's capacity to lead a
law-abiding life when released at a later date. release of the committed
offender would have a very significant and quantifiable effect on
institutional discipline; or
(c) The board has determined that there is a very substantial risk
that the committed offender will commit a violent act against a person.
(4) In making the determination regarding the risk that a committed
offender will not conform to the conditions of parole, the board shall
take into account the factors set forth in subsection (2) of section
83-1,114 and shall comply with the requirements of subsection (3) of
section 83-1,114 and section 83-196.01.
(5) The board shall continue granting parole to offenders under this
section until the director certifies that the population is at
-72-

LB606 LB606
2025 2025
operational capacity. The director shall so certify within thirty days
after the date on which the population first reaches operational
capacity.
Sec. 60. Original sections 47-624, 47-624.01, 47-627, 47-629,
47-903, 47-908, 47-919, 81-1401, 83-170, 83-171, 83-171.01, 83-173,
83-174.03, 83-174.04, 83-174.05, 83-192, 83-1,100, 83-1,100.02, 83-1,103,
83-1,103.01, 83-1,103.02, 83-1,103.03, 83-1,103.04, 83-1,104, 83-1,107,
83-1,107.01, 83-1,107.02, 83-1,109, 83-1,118, 83-1,119, 83-1,122.02,
83-1,125, 83-1,125.01, and 83-962, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
and sections 28-322, 29-2246, 29-2252, 29-2261, 29-2935, 29-4019,
47-1102, 47-1103, 47-1104, 47-1105, 47-1106, 47-1107, 47-1108, 47-1109,
47-1110, 47-1111, 47-1113, 47-1114, 47-1115, 47-1116, 47-1117, 47-1119,
71-961, 71-3426, and 71-3430, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
Sec. 61. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
83-1,101 and 83-1,102, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-73-